aghul_pronouns.lexd
PATTERNS
PronStem PronCase


LEXICON PronStem
зун<prn><p1><sg>:з{X} #я
вун<prn><p2><sg>:в{X} #ты
хъин<prn><p1><pl><inc>:хъ #мы инк
чин<prn><p1><pl><inc>:чи #мы экс
чун<prn><p2><pl><inc>:чу #вы

LEXICON PronCase
<nom>:н
<erg>:н
<gen>:
<dat>:ас
<ins>:лди
<psl1>:фай
<psl2>:хъай
<psl3>:гIай

<loc1>:ф
<loc2>:гь
<loc3>:хь
<loc4>:кк
<loc5>:к
<loc6>:'
<loc7>:л
<loc8>:гI
